tr: Soğutma sıvısı çıkış bağlantı tipi: AN dişi; AN erkek; Çıkıntılı hortum boynu; Flanşlı çıkış; Hortum rakoru; NPT dişi; NPT erkek; Hızlı bağlantı; Geçmeli boru; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka za izlaz rashladne tekućine: AN ženski; AN muški; Grlo crijeva s izbočenjem; Izlaz s prirubnicom; Priključak za crijevo; NPT ženski; NPT muški; Brza spojnica; Navlačna cijev; Ostalo
sv: Kylvätskeutlopp – anslutningstyp: AN-hona; AN-hane; Rillad slanghals; Flänsat utlopp; Slangnippel; NPT-hona; NPT-hane; Snabbkoppling; Slip-on-rör; Annan
nb: Kjølevæskeutløp forbindelsesstil: AN-hunn; AN-hann; Slangestuss med vulst; Flenset uttak; Slangenippel; NPT-hunn; NPT-hann; Hurtigkobling; Glatt rør; Annet
es: Estilo de conexión de salida del refrigerante: AN hembra; AN macho; Cuello de manguera con reborde; Salida con brida; Espiga para manguera; NPT hembra; NPT macho; Conexión rápida; Tubo de conexión deslizante; Otro
da: Kølemiddeludløbets tilslutningstype: AN (hun); AN (han); Vulkst slangehals; Flangeudløb; Slangestuds; NPT (hun); NPT (han); Quick-connect; Slip-on-rør; Anden
fr: Type de raccordement de la sortie du liquide de refroidissement: AN femelle; AN mâle; Embout à bourrelet; Sortie à bride; Embout cannelé; NPT femelle; NPT mâle; Connexion rapide; Tube à emboîter; Autre
lt-LT: Aušinimo skysčio išėjimo jungties tipas: AN vidinis sriegis; AN išorinis sriegis; Žarnos atvamzdis su rumbeliu; Išvadas su junge; Žarnos antgalis; NPT vidinis sriegis; NPT išorinis sriegis; Greitoji jungtis; Užmaunamas vamzdelis; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на връзката на изхода за охлаждащата течност: AN женски; AN мъжки; Накрайник за маркуч с удебелен край; Изход с фланец; Щуцер за маркуч; NPT женски; NPT мъжки; Бърза връзка; Тръба за нахлузване; Друг
fi: Jäähdytysnesteen poistoliitännän tyyppi: AN, naaras; AN, uros; Helmellinen letkunkaula; Laipallinen ulostulo; Letkukara; NPT, naaras; NPT, uros; Pikaliitin; Pujotettava putki; Muu
sl-SI: Slog priključka odprtine za hladilno tekočino: AN ženski; AN moški; Orobani vrat za cev; Prirobnični izhod; Priključek za cev; NPT ženski; NPT moški; Hitri priključek; Natična cev; Drugo
ko: 냉각수 배출구 연결 방식: AN 암형; AN 수형; 비드 호스 넥; 플랜지형 아웃렛; 호스 바브; NPT 암형; NPT 수형; 퀵 커넥트; 슬립온 튜브; 기타
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia výstupu chladiacej kvapaliny: Vnútorný závit AN; Vonkajší závit AN; Obrúbené hrdlo na hadicu; Prírubový vývod; Hadicový tŕň; Vnútorný závit NPT; Vonkajší závit NPT; Rýchlospojka; Násuvná rúrka; Iné
de: Bauart des Kühlmittelauslassanschlusses: AN-Buchse; AN-Stecker; Gewulsteter Schlauchstutzen; Flanschauslass; Schlauchtülle; NPT-Innengewinde; NPT-Außengewinde; Schnellanschluss; Aufsteckrohr; Sonstige
nl: Aansluitstijl koelvloeistofuitlaat: AN vrouwelijk; AN mannelijk; Gerolde slangaansluiting; Geflensde uitlaat; Slangtule; NPT vrouwelijk; NPT mannelijk; Snelkoppeling; Opschuifbuis; Overig
en: Coolant outlet connection style: AN female; AN male; Beaded hose neck; Flanged outlet; Hose barb; NPT female; NPT male; Quick-connect; Slip-on tube; Other
it: Stile relazione uscita liquido refrigerante: Femmina AN; Maschio AN; Collo tubo con nervatura; Uscita flangiata; Portagomma; Femmina NPT; Maschio NPT; Connessione rapida; Tubo slip-on; Altro
pl: Styl połączenia wylotu płynu chłodzącego: Złącze żeńskie AN; Złącze męskie AN; Króciec węża z przetłoczeniem; Wylot kołnierzowy; Króciec na wąż; Złącze żeńskie NPT; Złącze męskie NPT; Szybkozłącze; Rurka wsuwana; Inny
th: รูปแบบการเชื่อมต่อช่องระบายความร้อน: ข้อต่อตัวเมีย AN; ข้อต่อตัวผู้ AN; คอท่อแบบมีสัน; ช่องออกหน้าแปลน; หางปลาไหล; ข้อต่อตัวเมีย NPT; ข้อต่อตัวผู้ NPT; แบบต่อเร็ว; ท่อแบบสวม; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 冷却液出口连接方式: AN 内螺纹; AN 外螺纹; 卷边软管颈; 法兰出口; 软管宝塔接头; NPT 内螺纹; NPT 外螺纹; 快速接头; 滑入式管; 其他
ro-RO: Stil conexiune ieșire lichid de răcire: Mamă AN; Tată AN; Ștuț de furtun cu nervură; Ieșire cu flanșă; Racord de furtun (barb); Mamă NPT; Tată NPT; Conectare rapidă; Tub tip slip-on; Altele
hu: Hűtőfolyadék leeresztőcsapjának típusa: Belső menetes AN; Külső menetes AN; Peremes csőcsonk; Karimás kimenet; Bordás csőcsatlakozó; Belső menetes NPT; Külső menetes NPT; Gyorscsatlakozó; Rácsúsztatható cső; Egyéb
ja: クーラント出口連携スタイル: ANメス; ANオス; ビードホースネック; フランジアウトレット; ホースバーブ; NPTメス; NPTオス; クイックコネクト; スリップオンチューブ; その他
zh-TW: 冷卻液出口連接樣式: AN 母接頭; AN 公接頭; 珠狀軟管頸; 法蘭出口; 軟管倒刺接頭; NPT 母接頭; NPT 公接頭; 快速接頭; 套入式管; 其他
cs: Typ připojení odtoku chladicí kapaliny: Vnitřní závit AN; Vnější závit AN; Hrdlo hadice s lemem; Přírubový vývod; Hadicový nátrubek; Vnitřní závit NPT; Vnější závit NPT; Rychlospojka; Násuvná trubka; Jiné
pt-BR: Estilo de conexão da saída do líquido de arrefecimento: Fêmea AN; Macho AN; Gargalo da mangueira com rebordo; Saída flangeada; Espigão para mangueira; Fêmea NPT; Macho NPT; Engate rápido; Tubo de encaixe; Outro
ru: Тип соединения выходного патрубка охлаждающей жидкости: AN (внутренняя резьба); AN (наружная резьба); Патрубок с буртиком; Фланцевый выпуск; Штуцер для шланга; NPT (внутренняя резьба); NPT (наружная резьба); Быстроразъемное соединение; Гладкий патрубок; Другое
pt-PT: Estilo de ligação da saída do líquido de refrigeração: Fêmea AN; Macho AN; Gargalo de mangueira frisado; Saída flangeada; Espigão de mangueira; Fêmea NPT; Macho NPT; Ligação rápida; Tubo de encaixe; Outro
vi: Kiểu kết nối đầu ra chất làm mát: Ren trong AN; Ren ngoài AN; Cổ ống có gờ; Cửa xả có mặt bích; Đầu nối đuôi chuột; Ren trong NPT; Ren ngoài NPT; Kết nối nhanh; Ống lồng; Khác
el: Στυλ σύνδεσης εξόδου ψυκτικού υγρού: AN θηλυκό; AN αρσενικό; Λαιμός εύκαμπτου σωλήνα με χείλος; Φλαντζωτή έξοδος; Ρακόρ εύκαμπτου σωλήνα; NPT θηλυκό; NPT αρσενικό; Ταχεία σύνδεση; Σωλήνας slip-on; Άλλο